Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.240

Service of process outside state.

Personal service of any process in an action under this chapter may be made upon any person outside the state if such person has engaged in conduct in violation of this chapter which conduct has had impact in this state which this chapter reprehends. Such person shall be deemed to have thereby submitted himself or herself to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state within the meaning of RCW 4.28.180 and 4.28.185, as now or hereafter amended.

[ 2011 c 336 s 539; 1969 ex.s. c 228 s 24.]